Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-336
Pickle card or pickle card unit; serial number required; manufacturer; duties.

Each manufacturer of pickle cards or pickle card units shall assign a serial number to each unit of pickle cards he or she manufactures and place such number on each flare card supplied by such manufacturer and on each pickle card in the unit. No manufacturer shall sell or furnish to any person a unit of pickle cards with the same serial number as a unit which such manufacturer has previously distributed in this or any other state within the three years prior to such sale or furnishing.

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 25;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-186.03;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 102;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 83.